Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-802
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Chiropractic Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-803 to 38-805 apply.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 243.